New York, session 2025-2026, A3142.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3-a of section 2975 of the public authorities 2 law, as added by chapter 506 of the laws of 2009, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 3-a. A direct portion of these funds shall be allocated to fund the 5 authorities budget office established by section four of this chapter. 6 Such allocation shall only be used for the direct expenses of the 7 authorities budget office and shall not include fringe benefits and 8 indirect costs. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04318-01-5